South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3609.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 5, Title 43 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 43-5-12. For purposes of calculating the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefit amount, a child, other than a foster child, under the age of eighteen who lives with and is under the parental control of a household member other than his or her parent must be considered a member of the household. For purposes of this section, the child must be considered to be under parental control if the child is financially or otherwise dependent on a member of the household. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----